Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 2. Administrative Hearing Procedure for Bureau of Plant Industry.

§ 69-25-51.
Alleged violation of rules and regulations of Bureau of Plant Industry; right to hearing; Director of the Bureau of Plant Industry as reviewing officer; determination; penalty.

When any administrative allegation or charge is made against a person for violating the rules and regulations of the Bureau of Plant Industry of the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce or the laws under Sections 69-3-1 through 69-3-29, Sections 69-19-1 through 69-19-15, Sections 69-21-101 through 69-21-128, Sections 69-23-1 through 69-23-135, Sections 69-25-1 through 69-25-47 or Sections 69-25-101 through 69-25-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, the Director of the Bureau of Plant Industry, or his designee, shall act as the reviewing officer. The complaint must be in writing, signed by the person making the charge, and filed in the Office of the Bureau of Plant Industry. The department shall send a copy of the complaint and any supporting documents to the person accused along with a summons requiring the accused to respond to the allegations within thirty (30) days. The notification shall be accomplished by any of the methods provided for in Rule 4 of the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure or by certified mail. If the accused does not respond within the thirty-day period, he shall be considered to be in default. Upon receipt of the response and any supporting documents from the accused, the reviewing officer shall determine the merits of the complaint. The reviewing officer may meet informally with the accused and discuss the alleged violation with him.

If the reviewing officer determines that the complaint lacks merit, he may dismiss the complaint.

If the reviewing officer determines that there is substantial evidence that a violation has occurred or if the accused admits to the truth of the allegations upon which the complaint is based, the reviewing officer may impose an appropriate penalty on the accused, which may be any or all of the following:

Issue a warning letter.

Suspend, modify, deny, cancel or revoke any license or permit granted by the department to the accused.

Issue a stop sale order with regard to any pesticide, plant or other material regulated by the department that is mislabeled or otherwise not in compliance with applicable law or regulations.

Require the accused to relabel any pesticide, plant or other material regulated by the department that is mislabeled.

Seize any pesticide, plant or other material regulated by the department and sell, destroy or otherwise dispose of the material and apply the proceeds of the sale to the state’s expenses and any fees or penalties levied under this article.

Refuse to register, cancel or suspend the registration of a pesticide, plant or other material that is not in compliance with any applicable law or regulation.

Levy a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each violation.

In determining the amount of the penalty, the reviewing officer shall consider the appropriateness of the penalty for the particular violation, the effect of the penalty on the person’s ability to continue in business and the gravity of the violation.

If the accused requests a hearing with the department, in writing, within thirty (30) days from receipt of the decision of the reviewing officer, the commissioner shall appoint three (3) members of the advisory board to the Bureau of Plant Industry to act as a hearing committee and a hearing shall be scheduled. If the accused fails to request a hearing within the thirty-day period, the decision of the reviewing officer is final.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 515, § 17; Laws, 2012, ch. 502, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 407, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 69-25-53.
Hearing procedure; decision of hearing committee.

Within a reasonable time after the accused’s request for a hearing, the hearing committee shall conduct an evidentiary hearing. For good cause shown, the hearing committee may grant a continuance of the hearing. Written notice of the date, time and place of such hearing shall be delivered to the accused not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the hearing.

A court reporter shall be in attendance and shall record the proceedings. The hearing committee shall have the right and duty to impose reasonable restrictions as it may deem necessary or appropriate to insure an orderly, expeditious and impartial proceeding. The parties may offer oral testimony through witnesses and shall have the right of cross-examination. The rules of evidence shall be relaxed.

At the hearing, the hearing committee may administer oaths and receive evidence, either oral or documentary. Upon the request of either party, the Department of Agriculture and Commerce may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of books, papers, records or other documentary evidence. If a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued by the department, either party may invoke the aid of any court of general jurisdiction of this state. The court may order such person to comply with the requirements of the subpoena. Failure to comply with the order of the court may be treated as contempt.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing committee shall render a written decision incorporating the findings of facts, conclusions of law and penalty, if any. The hearing committee may impose any penalty authorized under Section 69-25-51. A copy of the decision of the hearing committee shall be delivered to the accused by certified mail.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 474, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 69-25-55.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2005, ch. 533, § 36 effective from and after July 1, 2005.

[Laws, 1992, ch. 474, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1992.]

§ 69-25-57.
Jurisdiction of Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall have jurisdiction over all persons and property necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of this article and he may adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 474, § 4; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 69-25-59.
Judicial review.

Any individual aggrieved by a final decision of the hearing committee shall be entitled to judicial review.

An appeal from the decision of the hearing committee shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal with the circuit court clerk of the county where the accused resides, or in the case of a nonresident accused, in the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County. The notice of appeal and the payment of costs must be filed and paid with the circuit clerk, within thirty (30) days of the entry of the order being appealed. The appeal shall otherwise be conducted in accordance with existing laws and rules.

Any party aggrieved by the action of the circuit court may appeal to the Mississippi Supreme Court in the manner provided by law and rules.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 474, § 5; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 69-25-61.
Emergency procedure when herbicide or insecticide violation presents clear and present danger to public health, safety or welfare; Department of Agriculture and Commerce authorized to issue emergency orders prior to hearing.

When a violation occurs, or is about to occur, that presents and clear and present danger to the public health, safety or welfare and requires immediate action, the commissioner, department field inspectors, or any person authorized by the commissioner, may issue an order to be effective immediately, prior to notice and a hearing, that imposes any or all of the following penalties against the accused:

A stop sale order for any pesticide, plant or other material regulated by the department that is mislabeled or otherwise not in compliance with applicable law or regulations.

Require the accused to relabel any pesticide, plant or other material regulated by the department that is mislabeled.

Seize any pesticide, plant or other material regulated by the department and sell, destroy or otherwise dispose of such material and apply the proceeds of such sale to the state’s expenses and any fees or penalties levied.

Refuse to register, or cancel or suspend the registration of a pesticide, plant or other material that is not in compliance with any applicable law or regulation.

The order shall be served upon the accused in the same manner that the summons and complaint may be served upon him, except that, in the alternative, it may be served by giving a copy of the order to the attendant or clerk at the accused’s establishment. The accused shall then have thirty (30) days after service of the order to request an informal administrative review before the Director of the Bureau of Plant Industry, or his designee, who shall act as reviewing officer. If the accused requests a review within thirty (30) days, the reviewing officer shall conduct an informal administrative review within ten (10) days after the request is made. If the accused does not request an informal administrative review within thirty (30) days, then he is deemed to have waived his right to a review. At the informal administrative review, subpoena power shall not be available, witnesses shall not be sworn nor be subject to cross-examination and there shall be no court reporter or record made of the proceedings. Each party may present its case in the form of documents or oral statements. The rules of evidence shall not apply. The reviewing officer’s decision shall be in writing, and it shall be delivered to the parties by certified mail.

If either party is aggrieved by the order of the reviewing officer, he may request a full evidentiary hearing before the hearing committee in accordance with the procedures in Sections 69-25-51 and 69-25-53. The request for an evidentiary hearing must be made with the department within thirty (30) days of receipt of the decision of the reviewing officer. Failure to request an evidentiary hearing within the thirty (30) days is deemed a waiver of such right. If either party is aggrieved by the decision of the hearing committee, he shall have the right of judicial review in circuit court and in the Supreme Court as provided in Section 69-25-59.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 474, § 6; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 69-25-63.
Payment and enforcement of penalties; fees and costs.

When any penalty assessed by the hearing officer or committee is not paid, the department may file suit in a court of competent jurisdiction for the purpose of reducing the order of the hearing officer or committee to judgment, and if successful on the merits, the department shall be entitled to an award for reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 474, § 7; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 69-25-65.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2005, ch. 533, § 37 effective from and after July 1, 2005.

[Laws, 1992, ch. 474, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1992.]